Tennessee statutes. Title 45 Banks And Financial Institutions
Part 19

Credit Card State Banks

45-2-1901. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Control” has the meaning set forth in 12 U.S.C. § 1841(a)(2);

“Credit card state bank” means a state bank chartered under the laws of Tennessee and whose principal office is in this state and the activities of which are limited to those permitted under § 45-2-1902;

“Domestic holding company” means a company or other affiliate, that either:

Controls a domestic or foreign lender and has its principal place of business in this state; or

[Deleted effective July 1, 2020.]

[Deleted effective July 1, 2020.]

Effective July 1, 2020, subdivisions (3)(A)(ii) and (3)(B) are hereby deleted. Also effective July 1, 2020, the language “, itself or through its parent company, subsidiary, or other affiliate,” in subdivision (3)(A) is hereby deleted. However, any company that organized pursuant to subdivision (3)(A)(ii) or (3)(B), and this part prior to July 1, 2020, and that continues to own or control a credit card state bank after July 1, 2020, shall retain authority to own or control a credit card state bank under the terms and conditions provided in this part;

“Domestic lender” means any bank, savings and loan association, savings bank, or credit union organized and supervised under the laws of this state or the United States, that has its principal place of business in this state or any other business organization that is authorized by law to accept deposits and make loans and has its principal place of business in this state;

“Foreign lender” means any bank, savings and loan association, savings bank, credit union, organized or chartered under the laws of the United States, or any state other than this state, or the District of Columbia, that has its principal place of business outside this state, or any other business organization that is authorized by law to accept deposits and make commercial loans and has its principal place of business outside this state;

“Holding company” means any company that controls a domestic or foreign lender; and

“Qualifying organization” means a corporation, partnership, or other entity that at all times maintains an office in this state, at which it employs at least one hundred (100) persons residing in this state, and that is directly engaged in providing the following services, either for the qualifying organization or on behalf of other domestic or foreign lenders or credit card state banks:

The distribution of credit cards or other devices designed and effective to access credit card accounts;

The preparation of periodic statements of amounts due under credit card accounts;

The receipt from credit card holders of amounts paid on or with respect to the accounts; and

The maintenance of financial records reflecting the status of the accounts from time to time. “Qualifying organization” also includes any domestic bank or credit card bank satisfying the employment and activities requirements set forth in this subdivision (7)(D).

Acts 1993, ch. 447, § 4; 2007 ch. 6, §§ 1, 4; 2012, ch. 646, § 1; 2015, ch. 230, §§ 1, 2; 2018, ch. 550, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2007, ch. 6, § 4 provided that the provisions of the act shall sunset effective July 1, 2012, unless reenacted or extended by the general assembly prior to that date; however, any company that has organized and continues to own or control a credit card state bank pursuant to the provisions of the act on July 1, 2012, shall retain the authority to own or control a credit card state bank under the terms and conditions provided in title 45, chapter 2, part 19. Acts 2012, ch. 646, § 1 reenacted and extended the provisions of Acts 2007, ch. 6, § 4 until July 1, 2015, effective June 30, 2012.

Cross-References. Negotiable instruments, title 47, ch. 3.

45-2-1902. Organization — Filing fees — Authorized activities.

Subject to this chapter and to the approval of the commissioner, any domestic lender, foreign lender, or holding company may organize, own, and control a credit card state bank on the terms and conditions provided in this part. Notwithstanding § 45-2-607(11), a state bank may own up to one hundred percent (100%) of the shares of a credit card state bank.

Effective July 1, 2020, the language “, including a domestic holding company,” in subdivision (a)(1) is hereby deleted. However, any company that organized pursuant to such language, § 45-2-1901(3)(A)(ii) or (3)(B), and this part prior to July 1, 2020, and that continues to own or control a credit card state bank after July 1, 2020, shall retain authority to own or control a credit card state bank under the terms and conditions provided in this part.

If the credit card bank is to be organized under the laws of this state, the bank shall be organized as provided in this chapter, and the commissioner shall supervise, regulate, examine, and exercise enforcement authority as provided for in this chapter and chapter 1 of this title, and all applicable rules and regulations, to the extent the commissioner deems applicable to the entities. The credit card state bank shall at all times maintain capital stock and paid-in surplus of not less than two million dollars ($2,000,000).

In connection with the application to organize, own, and control a credit card state bank, the applicant shall pay a filing fee in an amount determined by rule by the commissioner.

A credit card state bank shall:

Engage only in credit card operations or the making of loans;

Effective July 1, 2020, the language “or debit, including prepaid debit,” in subdivision (d)(1)(A) is hereby deleted. However, any company that organized pursuant to such language, § 45-2-1901(3)(A)(ii) or (3)(B), and this part prior to July 1, 2020, and that continues to own or control a credit card state bank after July 1, 2020, shall retain authority to own or control a credit card state bank under the terms and conditions provided in this part;

Not accept demand deposits or deposits that the depositor may withdraw by check or similar means for payment to third parties or others;

Not accept any savings or time deposits of less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000);

Maintain only one (1) office that accepts deposits; and

If in existence on May 17, 1999, not engage in the business of making commercial loans, unless the charter is amended to include a provision electing to engage in commercial lending; or

If organized on or after May 17, 1999, not engage in the business of making commercial loans, unless the charter contains a provision or is subsequently amended to include a provision electing to engage in commercial lending.

A credit card state bank, unless the subsidiary of a domestic lender or domestic holding company, shall either:

Have, within one (1) year of the date it commences operations, fifty (50) employees located in this state devoted to the credit card activities contemplated by this part; or

Contract with a qualifying organization for the performance of the services.

A credit card state bank may issue credit in accordance with §§ 45-2-1903 — 45-2-1908.

A domestic lender is not required to establish a credit card state bank in order to issue credit cards, create credit card accounts and make loans, but may itself issue credit cards, create credit card accounts and make loans in accordance with §§ 45-2-1903 — 45-2-1908, or as otherwise permitted by law.

Acts 1993, ch. 447, § 5; 1999, ch. 168, §§ 1, 2; 2007, ch. 6, §§ 2-4; 2012, ch. 646, §§ 2, 3; 2015, ch. 230, § 3; 2018, ch. 550, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2007, ch. 6, § 4 provided that the provisions of the act, which amended subsection (a) and subdivision (d)(1), shall sunset effective July 1, 2012, unless reenacted or extended by the general assembly prior to that date; however, any company that has organized and continues to own or control a credit card state bank pursuant to the provisions of the act on July 1, 2012, shall retain the authority to own or control a credit card state bank under the terms and conditions provided in title 45, chapter 2, part 19. Acts 2012, ch. 646, §§ 2 and 3 reenacted and extended the provisions of Acts 2007, ch. 6, § 4 until July 1, 2015, effective June 30, 2012.

Attorney General Opinions. By providing that three different defined entities, i.e., a domestic lender, a foreign lender, or a holding company, may organize, own, and control a credit card bank, the general assembly meant to exclude entities that fall outside these defined terms from exercising the same powers, OAG 01-129, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 136 (8/17/01).

45-2-1903. Part definitions — Credit card accounts.

For purposes of this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Bank” means a credit card state bank established and operated in accordance with § 45-2-1902 or a domestic lender;

“Credit card account” or “credit card plan” means any account that can be accessed by a credit card, including a debit card with a credit feature, whereby the cardholder may obtain loans from time to time either by credit card cash advance or by the purchase or satisfaction by the bank of obligations of the cardholder incurred pursuant to a credit card. “Cardholder” includes borrowers and other primary obligors on loans. With regard to a state credit card bank electing to make loans pursuant to § 45-2-1902(d)(5), and with regard to a domestic lender electing to make loans pursuant to §§ 45-2-1901 — 45-2-1908, “credit card account” or “credit card plan” also includes loans; and

“Loan” means any extension of credit, including, but not limited to, credit extended under plans or in transactions for which no credit card is issued, whether by way of installment, single payment, add-on, discount factoring, or otherwise for personal, consumer, agricultural or commercial purposes.

A bank may extend credit under this part through a credit card account.

This part governs the entire credit card account and all transactions thereunder, including transactions made by check or by another access device or instrument not constituting a credit card. Regardless of the cardholder's place of residence, a credit card account authorized by this part shall be governed solely by federal law and the law of this state, except to the extent the agreement relating to the account provides otherwise. Any other law of this state, including any statute, regulation, or common law, that limits the authority provided by this part or the rate or amount of interest, discount, points, finance charges, time-price differential, service charges or other fees and charges that may be charged, taken, collected, received, or reserved, shall not apply to extensions of credit under a credit card plan that is subject to this part.

Acts 1993, ch. 447, § 6; 1999, ch. 168, §§ 3, 4; 2001, ch. 54, § 34.

45-2-1904. Interest — Fees and charges.

With respect to extensions of credit made on credit card accounts, a bank may charge and collect interest at an annual rate not exceeding thirty percent (30%) per year or at an equivalent daily, weekly, monthly, or quarterly rate.

In addition to the interest charges authorized by subsection (a), a bank may charge and collect with respect to credit card accounts additional types of fees and charges that are agreed upon between the bank and the cardholder, in amounts that are specified in or determined in accordance with the agreement between the bank and the cardholder. The additional fees and charges may include, but are not limited to, a monthly, annual or other periodic charge, and/or a one-time charge, for the privileges or services made available to the cardholder under the plan; transaction charges for each purchase or cash advance under the plan; a minimum charge for each monthly, annual or other scheduled billing period under the plan during any portion of which there is an outstanding unpaid indebtedness; a late payment or delinquency charge; fees incident to the application for and/or the opening, administration and termination of a plan, which in the case of secured plans, may include, but not be limited to, fees and charges relative to the inspection, verification, and protection of the collateral and the establishment, perfection, enforcement and release of the security interest; returned payment charges; charges for providing sales slips, invoices, checks, duplicate periodic statements or other documents; stop payment fees; charges for exceeding a predetermined credit limit or for initiating a transaction that, if consummated, would result in an outstanding balance in excess of the credit limit; automated teller machine charges or similar electronic or interchange fees or charges; charges for issuing additional or replacement credit cards; and other fees and charges that may be agreed upon between the bank and the cardholder.

If credit under a credit card plan is offered and extended in connection with overdrafts under a demand deposit account or other transaction account maintained by the cardholder with a bank, the bank may continue to impose any charges customarily imposed by it under the terms governing the demand deposit or other transaction account, including, but not limited to, check charges, monthly maintenance charges, checkbook charges, debit card charges, charges for checks drawn on funds in excess of an available line of credit and other similar charges, without the necessity of the bank making specific reference to the charges in the agreement governing the credit card plan, and the amount of the charge may be charged to the cardholder's account under the plan.

In the event a borrower defaults under the terms of a plan and the bank refers the borrower's account to an attorney (including a regular salaried employee of the bank) for collection, the bank may, if the agreement governing the credit card plan so provides, charge and collect from the cardholder a reasonable attorney's fee and, in addition, if the agreement governing the plan (or, in the case of secured plans, the security agreement or similar instrument) so provides, the bank may recover from the cardholder all court and other collection costs, including, in the case of secured plans, all costs of enforcing the security agreement or similar instrument, actually incurred by the bank, including those incurred on appeal. Banks may charge and collect interest charges following default of the cardholder and/or judgment in favor of the bank at the rates permitted by this part.

If a bank purchases or satisfies an obligation of the cardholder at less than the face amount of the obligation, the discount is not considered a fee or charge limited by this section.

Acts 1993, ch. 447, § 7; 2017, ch. 225, § 1.

45-2-1905. Variable interest rates.

If the agreement governing the credit card plan so provides, the rate or rates of interest under the plan may vary in accordance with a schedule or formula, and/or upon the happening of any event or circumstance specified in the agreement, including, but not limited to, the failure of the cardholder to perform in accordance with the terms of the agreement. The interest rates, as so varied, may be made applicable to all or any part of the outstanding indebtedness under the plan on or after the effective date of the variation, including the indebtedness arising out of extensions of credit made prior to the variation in the interest rates.

Acts 1993, ch. 447, § 8.

45-2-1906. Computation of interest.

A bank may charge and collect the interest charges authorized by § 45-2-1904(a) on each credit extension under the credit card plan from the date the cardholder makes a purchase or obtains a cash advance through the date payment is credited to the account in accordance with applicable federal law.

Subject to the terms of the written agreement between a bank and a cardholder, outstanding balances may be computed at the beginning or end of any period or on an average basis for the period. Outstanding balances may include any interest charges and other fees and charges posted to the account. Accordingly, a bank may compound interest charges on extension of credit under this part, on a daily or other basis.

For purposes of determining the daily, weekly, monthly or quarterly rate of interest equivalent to an annual rate, the annual rate shall be divided by: three hundred sixty (360), if the written agreement so provides, or three hundred sixty-five (365), fifty-two (52), twelve (12), or four (4), as the case may be, without regard to the effect of leap years, periods of varying lengths, compounding of interest charges or other factors. A billing period shall be deemed to be a month or monthly if the last day of each billing period is on the same day of each month or does not vary by more than four (4) days from the same day.

Payments received by a bank under a credit card account may be applied by the bank to purchases, cash advances and/or fees and charges imposed by the bank, in any order, and a bank shall not be required to set forth its payment allocation method in the account agreement or give notice of a change in its payment allocation method, except as required by federal law.

Acts 1993, ch. 447, § 9; 2001, ch. 54, § 33.

45-2-1907. Amendment of credit card agreement.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b), a bank may amend its credit card agreement with a cardholder by any method permitted therein upon complying with applicable federal disclosure laws, including, but not limited to, by sending a written change-in-terms notice prior to the effective date of the change, if the change-in-terms notice is required by federal law. The agreement, as so amended, may be made applicable to all or any part of the outstanding indebtedness under the plan on or after the effective date of the amendment, including indebtedness arising out of extensions of credit made prior to the amendment.

An amendment that materially increases applicable interest rates or other charges or is otherwise materially adverse to the cardholder shall take effect only if the cardholder consents. If the cardholder does give any required consent, the amendment may be made applicable to all or any part of the outstanding indebtedness under the plan on or after the effective date of the amendment, including indebtedness arising out of extensions of credit made prior to the amendment. If the cardholder does not give any required consent, the cardholder shall be permitted to pay the outstanding unpaid indebtedness in accordance with the terms of the agreement, without giving effect to the amendment, and the bank may terminate any further credit extensions under the plan, unless the credit card agreement provides otherwise.

The cardholder's consent, for purposes of subsection (b), may be expressed by any affirmative act, including, but not limited to, continued usage of the account after a date specified in a change-in-terms or amendment notice sent by the bank. As an alternative, the change-in-terms or amendment notice may require that the cardholder take specified action, such as returning all credit cards and other access devices to the account by a specified date, in which case the cardholder's failure to take action shall be deemed consent by the cardholder to the changed or amended terms.

Acts 1993, ch. 447, § 10.

45-2-1908. Security for cardholders' obligations.

A bank may take security of any type, including, but not limited to, a mortgage or deed of trust on residential property or a deposit account or certificate of deposit, for a cardholder's obligations under a credit card account.

Acts 1993, ch. 447, § 11.